District of Columbia statutes.
29-101.01

Short titles.

(a)

This title may be cited as the “Business Organizations Code”.

(b)

This chapter may be cited as the “Business Organizations Code General Provisions Act of 2010”.

(c)

Subchapter IV of this chapter may be cited as the “Registered Agent Act of 2010”.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

D.C. Law 18-378 amended and enacted into law Title 29 of the District of Columbia Official Code. Former Title 29 was recodified as Title 29A, D.C. Code § 29A-101.01 et seq., and was repealed by D.C. Law 18-378, effective January 1, 2012.

Applicability date of D.C. Law 18-378: Section 5 of D.C. Law 18-378, as amended by section 7082 of D.C. Law 19-21, provided: “Sec. 5. Applicability. This act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.”.

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the “District of Columbia Official Code Title 29 (Business Organizations) Enactment Act of 2010”, see Mayor’s Order 2011-178, October 25, 2011 ( 58 DCR 9412).
Short title: Section 7081 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle I of title VII of the act may be cited as “District of Columbia Official Code Title 29 (Business Organizations) Implementation Amendment Act of 2011”.